California, session 20252026, AB1277.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 241 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:241. (a) The Judicial Council shall sponsor a pilot program for two fiscal years to study whether increases in juror compensation and mileage reimbursement rates increase juror diversity and participation. The Judicial Council shall select at least six trial courts, in counties with regional and geographic diversity, including the County of Alameda, to participate in the pilot program.(b) As part of the pilot program, the participating pilot courts shall collect demographic information, as reported by jurors.(c) No later than September 1, 2026, the Judicial Council shall provide a report to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code describing the findings of the pilot program and providing information for promoting juror diversity. The Judicial Council shall also make the report available to the public on its internet website.(d) The Judicial Council may enlist the services of a consultant to conduct the study.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.